Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297H.01, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Residential generator. "Residential generator" means any of the following: (1) a detached single family residence that generates mixed municipal solid waste or nonmixed municipal solid waste; (2) a person residing in a building or site containing multiple residences that generates mixed municipal solid waste, including apartment buildings, common interest communities, or manufactured home parks, where each residence is separately billed by the waste service provider; (3) an owner of a building or site containing multiple residences or an association representing residences that generate mixed municipal solid waste or nonmixed municipal solid waste, including apartment buildings, condominiums, manufactured home parks, or townhomes where no residence is separately billed for such service by the waste management service provider and the owner or association is billed directly for the waste management services. A residential generator does not include a self-haulerdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) an organization exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that receives donations for resale and salvage from an entity listed in clauses (1) to (3). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end